Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-309 Existing licenses. Except
as otherwise determined by the commissioner, a captive insurance company that
has been issued a certificate of authority by the commissioner pursuant to
section 431:19-102 as of July 1, 2008, and is licensed as a class 4 company
shall not be required to re-apply for a certificate of authority under this
part, but shall otherwise be subject to this part as a sponsored captive
insurance company; provided that the commissioner may by order require the
captive insurance company to take any action that the commissioner determines
is reasonably necessary to bring the captive insurance company into compliance
with this part. [L 2008, c 190, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 253, §22]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next